Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF822.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2782YH (3) 91 th/ns H.F. 822 Section 1. Section 321E.3, subsection 1, paragraph b, 1 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 (1) The department may issue all-systems permits under 3 section 321E.8 which are valid for movement on all paved 4 highways or streets, except the interstate road system if 5 prohibited under section 321E.8 , and except any highways 6 or streets under the jurisdiction of local authorities 7 upon which an all-systems permit is not valid as determined 8 by the applicable local authority if the local authority 9 indicates such highways and streets to the department in 10 writing, including by means of electronic communication. 11 However, a local authority shall not determine that any paved 12 farm-to-market road, or highway or street designated as a 13 truck route, is not valid for purposes of an all-systems 14 permit without justification. In addition, a local authority 15 shall not determine that every paved highway and street under 16 its jurisdiction is not valid for purposes of an all-systems 17 permit. A highway or street under the jurisdiction of a local 18 authority upon which movement under an all-systems permit 19 is valid shall connect with a highway or street under the 20 jurisdiction of the state, or with another highway or street 21 upon which movement under an all-systems permit is valid 22 that ultimately connects with a highway or street under the 23 jurisdiction of the state. 24